Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3034.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin HEARTLAND STATE TRAIL CONNECTION.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $6,250,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the commissioner of natural resources to acquire land for and to construct a paved multiuse trail segment to connect Itasca State Park to the Heartland Trail, beginning from about two miles east of the Heartland Trail Phase 1 tunnel under marked Highway 71 and proceeding in a direction toward the city of Emmaville. This appropriation is also for the environmental review, predesign, design, and construction of a paved multiuse trail and a trailhead in the city of Emmaville at the trail junction with the Heartland Trail. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $6,250,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end